Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.120

Property of deceased inmates of state institutions—Sale—Disposition of proceeds.

The property, other than money, of such deceased inmate remaining in the custody of a superintendent of a state institution after the expiration of the above two-year period may be forwarded to the department of corrections at its request and may be appraised and sold at public auction to the highest bidder in the manner and form as provided for public sales of personal property, and all moneys realized upon such sale, after deducting the expenses thereof, shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury.

[ 1981 c 136 s 59; 1979 c 141 s 11; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.120. Prior: 1951 c 138 s 3; prior: 1923 c 113 s 2; RRS s 1363-2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Abandoned inmate personal property: RCW 63.42.030, 63.42.040.